Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1310
Veterans discharge or record of separation; registration upon application.

Any person residing in Nebraska or who entered the service from Nebraska and who served in any branch of the armed forces of the United States may apply for registration of his or her discharge or record of separation in the office of the county clerk where such person resides. No fee shall be charged for recording such discharge or record of separation.

Laws 1921, c. 123, § 2, p. 533;

C.S.1922, § 4936;

C.S.1929, § 26-1013;

R.S.1943, § 23-1310;

Laws 1953, c. 60, § 2, p. 199;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 5.